Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3861
(UTC 705) Resignation of trustee.

(UTC 705) (a) A trustee may resign:

(1) upon at least thirty days' notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the settlor, if living, and all cotrustees; or

(2) with the approval of the court.

(b) In approving a resignation, the court may issue orders and impose conditions reasonably necessary for the protection of the trust property.

(c) Any liability of a resigning trustee or of any sureties on the trustee's bond for acts or omissions of the trustee is not discharged or affected by the trustee's resignation.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 61.